Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.241

Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the secretary of state for filing does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the appropriate court under RCW 23.95.245 to order the signing or delivery of the record.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6111; 2009 c 188 s 205.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.